Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201367-248.02
Merger or consolidation;
procedure; effect.

(a)(1) A domestic limited partnership
may merge or consolidate with one or more domestic or foreign limited partnerships
or other business entities pursuant to an agreement or plan of merger or consolidation
adopted in accordance with this section setting forth:

(A) The name of each limited partnership or business entity that is
a party to the merger or consolidation;

(B) The name, type of business entity, and jurisdiction of formation
of the surviving limited partnership or business entity into which the limited
partnership and such other business entities will merge or the name, type
of business entity, and jurisdiction of formation of the new business entity
resulting from the consolidation of the limited partnership and the other
business entities that are party to a plan of consolidation;

(C) The terms and conditions of the merger or consolidation, including
the manner and basis of converting the interests of the partners, members,
or shareholders, as the case may be, of each limited partnership or business
entity that is a party to such merger or consolidation into interests or obligations
of the surviving or new limited partnership or business entity resulting therefrom
or into money or other property in whole or in part; and

(D) Such other provisions as the merging or consolidating limited partnerships
or business entities may desire.

(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 67-450, an agreement or
plan of merger or consolidation shall be approved (A) by each domestic limited
partnership that is a party thereto in accordance with the voting provisions
of its partnership agreement or, if not so provided, by each general partner
and by limited partners who own in the aggregate more than a fifty percent
interest in the profits of such limited partnership owned by all of the limited
partners or, if there is more than one class or group of limited partners,
then by limited partners of each class or group of limited partners, in either
case, who own in the aggregate more than fifty percent of the then current
percentage of other interest in the profits of such limited partnership owned
by all of the limited partners in each such class or group and (B) by each
other business entity that is a party thereto in accordance with the laws
under which such business entity was formed and in accordance with the applicable
requirements of its organizational documents. Notwithstanding such approval,
at any time before the articles of merger or consolidation are filed, an agreement
or plan of merger or of consolidation may be terminated or amended pursuant
to a provision for such termination or amendment contained in such agreement
or plan of merger or of consolidation.

(b) As used in this section:

(1) Business entity means a domestic or foreign corporation; a domestic
or foreign partnership; a domestic or foreign limited partnership; or a domestic
or foreign limited liability company; and

(2) Organizational documents includes:

(A) For a domestic or foreign corporation, its articles of incorporation,
bylaws, and other agreements among its shareholders which are authorized by
its governing statute or comparable records as provided in its governing statute;

(B) For a domestic or foreign partnership, its partnership agreement;

(C) For a domestic or foreign limited partnership, its certificate of
limited partnership and partnership agreement; and

(D) For a domestic or foreign limited liability company, its certificate
or articles of organization and operating agreement or comparable records
as provided in its governing statute.

(c) After a plan of merger or consolidation with respect to a domestic
limited partnership is approved in accordance with this section, the surviving
or resulting business entity shall deliver to the Secretary of State for filing
articles of merger or consolidation setting forth:

(1) The plan of merger or consolidation;

(2) A statement to the effect that the requisite approval was obtained
by the partners, members, or shareholders, as the case may be, of each business
entity that is a party to such plan of merger or consolidation; and

(3) If the surviving or resulting business entity of a merger or consolidation
is not a domestic business entity, an agreement by the surviving or resulting
business entity that it may be served with process within or outside this
state in any proceeding in the courts of this state for the enforcement of
any obligation of such former domestic limited partnership.

(d) If the surviving or resulting business entity of a merger or consolidation
under this section is a domestic corporation, then the merger or consolidation
shall become effective and shall have the effects provided in sections 21-20,128
to 21-20,134. If the surviving or resulting business entity of a merger or
consolidation under this section is a domestic limited liability company,
then the merger or consolidation shall become effective and shall have the
effects provided in sections 21-170 to 21-174. If the surviving or resulting
business entity of a merger or consolidation under this section is a domestic
partnership other than a limited partnership, then the merger or consolidation
shall become effective and shall have the effects provided in sections 67-450
to 67-452. If the surviving or resulting business entity of a merger or consolidation
is a domestic limited partnership, then:

(1) The merger or consolidation shall take effect on the later of:

(A) The approval of the plan or agreement of merger or consolidation
as provided in this section;

(B) The filing of all documents required by law to be filed as a condition
to the effectiveness of the merger or consolidation; or

(C) Any effective date specified in the plan or agreement of merger
or consolidation;

(2) The several limited partnerships and other business entities which
are parties to the plan or agreement of merger or consolidation shall be a
single limited partnership which, in the case of a merger, shall be that limited
partnership designated in the merger plan or agreement as the surviving limited
partnership and, in the case of a consolidation, shall be the new limited
partnership provided for in the consolidation plan or agreement;

(3) The separate existence of all limited partnerships and other business
entities which are parties to the plan or agreement of merger or consolidation,
except the surviving or new limited partnership, shall cease;

(4) The surviving or new limited partnership shall have all the rights,
privileges, immunities, and powers and shall be subject to all the duties
and liabilities of a limited partnership organized under the Nebraska Uniform
Limited Partnership Act;

(5) The surviving or new limited partnership shall possess all the rights,
privileges, immunities, and powers, of a public as well as of a private nature,
of each of the merging or consolidating limited partnerships and other business
entities, subject to the Nebraska Uniform Limited Partnership Act. All property,
real, personal, and mixed, all debts due on whatever account, all other things
and causes of actions, and all and every other interest belonging to or due
to any of the limited partnerships and other business entities, as merged
or consolidated, shall be taken and deemed to be transferred to and vested
in the surviving or new limited partnership without further act and deed and
shall thereafter be the property of the surviving or new limited partnership
as they were of any of such merging or consolidating business entities. The
title to any real property or any interest in such property vested in any
of such merging or consolidating business entities shall not revert or be
in any way impaired by reason of such merger or consolidation;

(6) Such surviving or new limited partnership shall be responsible and
liable for all the liabilities and obligations of each of the limited partnerships
and other business entities so merged or consolidated. Any claim existing
or action or proceeding pending by or against any of such limited partnerships
or other business entities may be prosecuted as if such merger or consolidation
had not taken place or such surviving or new limited partnership may be substituted
in its place. Neither the rights of creditors nor any liens upon the property
of any such limited partnerships or other business entities shall be impaired
by such merger or consolidation; and

(7) The equity interests or securities of each limited partnership or
other business entity which is a party to the plan or agreement of merger
or consolidation that are, under the terms of the merger or consolidation,
to be converted or exchanged, shall cease to exist, and the holders of such
equity interests or securities shall thereafter be entitled only to the cash,
property interests, or securities into which they shall have been converted
in accordance with the terms of the plan or agreement of merger or consolidation,
subject to any rights under sections 21-20,137 to 21-20,150 or the
Nebraska Uniform Limited Liability Company Act or other applicable law.

Laws 1989, LB 482, § 23;

Laws 1990, LB 1228, § 6;

Laws 1994, LB 884, § 84;

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 227;

Laws 1997, LB 523, § 69;

Laws 2010, LB888, § 101;

Laws 2012, LB1018, § 9;

Laws 2013, LB283, § 2.
September 6, 2013
Nebraska Uniform Limited Liability Company Act, see section 21-101.